lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/compress.aff
SFX G Y 1
SFX G   0     ing/S      .

SFX J Y 1
SFX J   0     ings       .

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0     s          .

SFX X Y 2
SFX X   0     s          .
SFX X   0     x          .

# Flags for f,fa,fb,fc

SFX A Y 3
SFX A 0 a .
SFX A 0 b .
SFX A 0 yy .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B 0 c .
SFX B 0 b .
SFX B 0 xx .

SFX a Y 1
SFX a 0 a .

SFX b Y 1
SFX b 0 b .

SFX c Y 1
SFX c 0 c .

# Flags for f,fd,fe,ff with red herring -+* flags that bias the greedy heuristics to prefer the "fd" stem initially

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 d .

SFX e Y 1
SFX e 0 e .

SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 f .

SFX - Y 2
SFX - d 0 d
SFX - d e d

SFX + Y 2
SFX + d 0 d
SFX + d e d

SFX * Y 2
SFX * d 0 d
SFX * d e d
